Hawaii statutes.
§454F-42 Statute of limitation; recovery
from fund. (a) No action for a judgment that subsequently results in an
order for collection from the mortgage loan recovery fund shall be commenced
later than six years from the accrual of the cause of action. When any
aggrieved person commences an action for a judgment that may result in
collection from the mortgage loan recovery fund, the aggrieved person shall
notify the commissioner in writing at the time of the commencement of the
action and shall submit to the commissioner any documents required by the
commissioner pursuant to rules issued in accordance with chapter 91.

(b) When any aggrieved person receives a valid
judgment upon the grounds of fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit that occurred
before the effective date of section 454F-41 against any licensee from any
circuit or district court where the violation occurred, the aggrieved person
shall proceed against the bond covering the license that was in force prior to
the enactment of section 454F-41 and establishment of the mortgage loan
recovery fund.

(c) The court shall proceed upon an
application to recover from the mortgage loan recovery fund in a summary manner
and, at hearing, the aggrieved person shall be required to show:

(1) The person is not a spouse of the judgment debtor
or the personal representative of a spouse of the judgment debtor;

(2) The person has complied with all the requirements
of this section;

(3) The person has obtained a judgment pursuant to
section 454F-41(a) that states the amount of the judgment and the amount owed
on the judgment debt as of the date of the application;

(4) The person has made all reasonable searches and
inquiries to ascertain whether the judgment debtor is possessed of real or
personal property or other assets liable to be sold or applied in satisfaction
of the judgment; and

(A) The search has uncovered no personal or
real property or other assets liable to be sold or applied; or

(B) The search has uncovered personal or real
property or other assets liable to be sold or applied, the person has taken all
necessary action and completed all necessary proceedings for the realization
thereof, and the amount realized was insufficient to satisfy the judgment;
provided that the person shall state the amount realized and the balance
remaining due on the judgment after application of the amount realized; and

(5) That where the licensee is a judgment debtor in a
bankruptcy proceeding, the aggrieved person has obtained an order from the
bankruptcy court declaring the judgment against the licensee to be
non-dischargeable.

(d) Upon hearing, if the court is satisfied of
the truth of all matters required by subsection (c) and that the aggrieved
person has fully pursued and exhausted all remedies available to the person for
recovering the amount awarded by the judgment of the court, the court shall
issue an order directing the commissioner to pay from the mortgage loan
recovery fund whatever sum the court finds to be payable upon the claim in
accordance with the limitations contained in this section.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision, the
liability of the mortgage loan recovery fund shall not exceed the sum of
$100,000 against any one licensee. [L 2010, c 84, pt of §3; am L 2011, c 194,
§14]

Note

References to effective date or enactment of section 454F-41
in subsection (b): Section 454F-41 was enacted by L 2010, c 84, pt of §3 and
effective July 1, 2010.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next